Washington statutes.
RCW 19.112.100

Methyl tertiary-butyl ether.

Methyl tertiary-butyl ether may not be intentionally added to any gasoline, motor fuel, or clean fuel produced for sale or use in the state of Washington after December 31, 2003. In no event may methyl tertiary-butyl ether be knowingly mixed in gasoline above fifteen one-hundredths of one percent by volume.

[ 2007 c 310 s 1; 2001 c 218 s 1.]